District of Columbia statutes.
36-304.14

Remedy for violation of subchapter.

Expired.

History

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-123, § 5A-304
as added July 18, 2005, D.C. Law 18-35, § 2(b), 56 DCR 4282

Editor's Notes

This subchapter expired on January 1, 2011, pursuant to section 3 of D.C. Law 18-35.